North Carolina, session 2025, SB753.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Reserve for Compensation Increases to provide pay raises for the State Highway Patrol the
sum of forty million four hundred eighty-two thousand four hundred eighty dollars ($40,482,480)
in each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to establish the pay scales set forth in this act.
SECTION 2. Effective July 1, 2025, the law enforcement officers of the State
Highway Patrol shall be paid based upon the following experience-based annual salary schedule:
Years of Experience 2025-2027 Biennium
0 $56,000
1 $62,125
2 $68,250
3 $75,375
4 $80,500
5 $86,625
6 $92,750
7 $98,875
8+ $105,000
SECTION 3. Effective July 1, 2025, Sworn State Highway Patrol employees who
are not subject to an experience-based annual salary schedule shall be paid at the following rates
by rank:
Rank 2025-2027 Biennium
Sergeant $120,750
First Sergeant $132,825
Lieutenant $146,108
Captain $160,718
Major $176,790
Lieutenant Colonel $194,469
Deputy Commander $204,193
Colonel $224,612
SECTION 4. Unless otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes law.
*S753-v-1*